Washington statutes.
RCW 18.140.140

Certificate, license, or registration—Required use of number.

(1) A certificate, license, or registration issued under this chapter shall bear the signature or facsimile signature of the director and a certificate, license, or registration number assigned by the director.

(2) Each state-certified or state-licensed real estate appraiser or state-registered appraiser trainee shall place his or her certificate, license, or registration number adjacent to or immediately below the title "state-certified general real estate appraiser," "state-certified residential real estate appraiser," "state-licensed real estate appraiser," or "state-registered appraiser trainee" when used in an appraisal report or in a contract or other instrument used by the certificate holder, licensee, or registered appraiser trainee in conducting real property appraisal activities, except that the certificate, license, or registration number shall not be required to appear when the title is not accompanied by a signature as is typical on such promotional and stationery items as brochures, business cards, forms, or letterhead.

(3) Each state-registered appraiser trainee shall place his or her registration number adjacent to or immediately below the title "state-registered appraiser trainee" when used in an appraisal report and the supervisory appraiser shall place his or her certificate number adjacent to or immediately below the title "state-certified general real estate appraiser" or "state-certified residential real estate appraiser."

[ 2005 c 339 s 11; 1996 c 182 s 7; 1993 c 30 s 14; 1989 c 414 s 18.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2005 c 339: See note following RCW 18.140.005.

Effective dates—1996 c 182: See note following RCW 18.140.005.